Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 9

LICENSING
OF ADJUSTERS AND BILL REVIEWERS

Note

Article heading amended by L 2000, c 288, §2; L 2003, c 212,
§52.

Case Notes

Where management company for foreign insurer authorized to do
business in Hawaii did not hold a general agent, subagent, or solicitor license
under this article (1993), it could not have been legally appointed as either a
general agent, subagent, or solicitor of insurer; thus it did not qualify as a
"general agent", "subagent", or "solicitor" as
defined by this chapter (1993), did not fall within the parameters of the
category described by §237-13(7) and was thus subject to a general excise tax
rate of four per cent pursuant to §237-13(6). 115 H. 180, 166 P.3d 353 (2007).

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Case Notes

Where management company for foreign insurer authorized to do
business in Hawaii did not hold a general agent, subagent, or solicitor license
under this article (1993), it could not have been legally appointed as either a
general agent, subagent, or solicitor of insurer; thus it did not qualify as a
"general agent", "subagent", or "solicitor" as
defined by this chapter (1993), did not fall within the parameters of the
category described by §237-13(7) and was thus subject to a general excise tax
rate of four per cent pursuant to §237-13(6). 115 H. 180, 166 P.3d 353 (2007).

§431:9-101 Scope. This article shall
govern the qualifications and procedures for granting licenses to all insurance
adjusters and independent bill reviewers. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2000,
c 288, §6; am L 2001, c 216, §7; am L 2006, c 154, §13]

Cross References

Independent bill reviewers, see §§431:9-241 to 243.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next